Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.060

Application for writ—Affidavit—Fee.

The judgment creditor as the plaintiff or someone in the judgment creditor's behalf shall apply for a writ of garnishment by affidavit, stating the following facts: (1) The plaintiff has a judgment wholly or partially unsatisfied in the court from which the writ is sought; (2) the amount alleged to be due under that judgment; (3) the plaintiff has reason to believe, and does believe that the garnishee, stating the garnishee's name and residence or place of business, is indebted to the defendant in amounts exceeding those exempted from garnishment by any state or federal law, or that the garnishee has possession or control of personal property or effects belonging to the defendant which are not exempted from garnishment by any state or federal law; and (4) whether or not the garnishee is the employer of the judgment debtor.

The judgment creditor shall pay to the clerk of the superior court the fee provided by RCW 36.18.016(6), or to the clerk of the district court the fee provided by RCW 3.62.060.

[ 2018 c 22 s 4; 2003 c 222 s 17; 1988 c 231 s 22. Prior: 1987 c 442 s 1006; 1987 c 202 s 133; 1981 c 193 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 55 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 4. Formerly RCW 7.33.040.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2018 c 22: See note following RCW 1.20.051.

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.